Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1. Appointment.
§ 64.2-2009.
Court order of appointment; limited guardianships and conservatorships.

The court’s order appointing a guardian or conservator shall (i) state the nature and extent of the person’s incapacity; (ii) define the powers and duties of the guardian or conservator so as to permit the incapacitated person to care for himself and manage property to the extent he is capable; (iii) specify whether the appointment of a guardian or conservator is limited to a specified length of time, as the court in its discretion may determine; (iv) specify the legal disabilities, if any, of the person in connection with the finding of incapacity, including but not limited to mental competency for purposes of Article II, § 1 of the Constitution of Virginia or Title 24.2; (v) include any limitations deemed appropriate following consideration of the factors specified in §

64.2-2007

; (vi) set the bond of the guardian and the bond and surety, if any, of the conservator; and (vii) where a petition is brought prior to the incapacitated person’s eighteenth birthday, pursuant to subsection C of §

64.2-2001

, whether the order shall take effect immediately upon entry or on the incapacitated person’s eighteenth birthday.

The court may appoint a limited guardian for an incapacitated person who is capable of addressing some of the essential requirements for his care for the limited purpose of medical decision making, decisions about place of residency, or other specific decisions regarding his personal affairs. The court may appoint a limited conservator for an incapacitated person who is capable of managing some of his property and financial affairs for limited purposes that are specified in the order.

Unless the guardian has a professional relationship with the incapacitated person or is employed by or affiliated with a facility where the person resides, the court’s order may authorize the guardian to consent to the admission of the person to a facility pursuant to §

37.2-805.1

, upon finding by clear and convincing evidence that (i) the person has severe and persistent mental illness that significantly impairs the person’s capacity to exercise judgment or self-control, as confirmed by the evaluation of a licensed psychiatrist; (ii) such condition is unlikely to improve in the foreseeable future; and (iii) the guardian has formulated a plan for providing ongoing treatment of the person’s illness in the least restrictive setting suitable for the person’s condition.

A guardian need not be appointed for a person who has appointed an agent under an advance directive executed in accordance with the provisions of Article 8 (§

54.1-2981

et seq.) of Chapter 29 of Title 54.1, unless the court determines that the agent is not acting in accordance with the wishes of the principal or there is a need for decision making outside the purview of the advance directive. A guardian need not be appointed for a person where a health care decision is made pursuant to, and within the scope of, the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.).

A conservator need not be appointed for a person (i) who has appointed an agent under a durable power of attorney, unless the court determines pursuant to the Uniform Power of Attorney Act (§

64.2-1600

et seq.) that the agent is not acting in the best interests of the principal or there is a need for decision making outside the purview of the durable power of attorney or (ii) whose only or major source of income is from the Social Security Administration or other government program and who has a representative payee.

All orders appointing a guardian shall include the following statements in conspicuous bold print in at least 14-point type:

“1. Pursuant to §

64.2-2009

of the Code of Virginia, ____________ (name of guardian), is hereby appointed as guardian of ____________ (name of respondent) with all duties and powers granted to a guardian pursuant to §

64.2-2019

of the Code of Virginia, including but not limited to: (enter a statement of the rights removed and retained, if any, at the time of appointment; whether the appointment of a guardian is a full guardianship, public guardianship pursuant to §

64.2-2010

of the Code of Virginia, limited guardianship pursuant to §

64.2-2009

of the Code of Virginia, or temporary guardianship; and the duration of the appointment).

2.

Pursuant to the provisions of subsection E of §

64.2-2019

of the Code of Virginia, a guardian, to the extent possible, shall encourage the incapacitated person to participate in decisions, shall consider the expressed desires and personal values of the incapacitated person to the extent known, and shall not unreasonably restrict an incapacitated person’s ability to communicate with, visit, or interact with other persons with whom the incapacitated person has an established relationship.

3.

Pursuant to §

64.2-2020

of the Code of Virginia, an annual report shall be filed by the guardian with the local department of social services for the jurisdiction where the incapacitated person resides.

4.

Pursuant to §

64.2-2012

of the Code of Virginia, all guardianship orders are subject to petition for restoration of the incapacitated person to capacity; modification of the type of appointment or areas of protection, management, or assistance granted; or termination of the guardianship.”

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.14; 1998, c. 582; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1009; 2009, cc. 211, 268; 2010, cc. 455, 632; 2012, c. 614; 2016, c. 31; 2020, c. 855; 2022, c. 630.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Department) shall convene a group of stakeholders to study the use of supported decision-making agreements in the Commonwealth, including making recommendations as to the use of supported decision-making agreements as a less restrictive alternative to the appointment of a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated person. The Department shall report the findings and recommendations of the stakeholder group’s study to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee on Health, Welfare, and Institutions no later than November 1, 2020.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 31 added clause (vii) in subsection A and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 855 added subsection E.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 630 added the last sentence in subsection D in the first paragraph.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-707 Petition for Appointment of Limited Guardian and Limited Conservator, et seq; No. 16-1913 Advance Medical Directive, et seq.

§ 64.2-2010.
Eligibility for public guardian or conservator.

The circuit court may appoint a local or regional program authorized by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services pursuant to Article 6 (§

51.5-149

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5 as the guardian or conservator for any resident of the Commonwealth who is found to be incapacitated if the court finds that (i) the incapacitated person’s resources are insufficient to fully compensate a private guardian and pay court costs and fees associated with the appointment proceeding and (ii) there is no other proper and suitable person willing and able to serve in such capacity or there is no guardian or conservator appointed within one month of adjudication pursuant to §

64.2-2015

. The court shall use the guidelines for determining indigency set forth in §

19.2-159

in determining the sufficiency of the respondent’s estate. If the respondent would be eligible for the appointment of counsel pursuant to §

19.2-159

, he shall be eligible for the appointment of a public guardian or conservator pursuant to this section.

History.

1998, c. 787, § 37.1-134.14:1; 2005, cc. 712, 716, § 37.2-1010; 2012, cc. 614, 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, amended former § 37.2-1010, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 4, the 2012 amendments by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59,
have been given effect in this section by substituting “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department for the Aging” and “Article 6 (§

51.5-149

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5” for “Article 2 (§ 2.2-711 et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 2.2.”

§ 64.2-2011.
Qualification of guardian or conservator; clerk to record order and issue certificate; reliance on certificate.

A guardian or conservator appointed in the court order shall qualify before the clerk upon the following:

Subscribing to an oath promising to faithfully perform the duties of the office in accordance with all provisions of this chapter;

Posting of bond, but no surety shall be required on the bond of the guardian, and the conservator’s bond may be with or without surety, as ordered by the court; and

Acceptance in writing by the guardian or conservator of any educational materials provided by the court.

Upon qualification, the clerk shall issue to the guardian or conservator a certificate with a copy of the order appended thereto. The clerk shall record the order in the same manner as a power of attorney would be recorded and shall, in addition to the requirements of §

64.2-2014

, provide a copy of the order to the commissioner of accounts. It shall be the duty of a conservator having the power to sell real estate to record the order in the office of the clerk of any jurisdiction where the respondent owns real property. If the order appoints a guardian, the clerk shall promptly forward a copy of the order to the local department of social services in the jurisdiction where the respondent then resides and to the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

A conservator shall have all powers granted pursuant to §

64.2-2021

as are necessary and proper for the performance of his duties in accordance with this chapter, subject to the limitations that are prescribed in the order. The powers granted to a guardian shall only be those powers enumerated in the court order.

Any individual or entity conducting business in good faith with a guardian or conservator who presents a currently effective certificate of qualification may presume that the guardian or conservator is properly authorized to act as to any matter or transaction, except to the extent of any limitations upon the fiduciary’s powers contained in the court’s order of appointment.

A person that refuses in violation of this subsection to accept a certificate of qualification is subject to (i) a court order mandating acceptance of the certificate of qualification and (ii) liability for reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in any action or proceeding that confirms the validity of the certificate of qualification or mandates acceptance of the certificate of qualification.

A person shall either accept or reject a certificate of qualification no later than seven business days after presentation of such certificate of qualification for acceptance. A person is not required to accept a certificate of qualification for a transaction if:

Engaging in the transaction with the guardian or conservator would be inconsistent with state or federal law;

The person has actual knowledge of the termination of the authority of the guardian or conservator or of the certificate of qualification before exercise of the power;

The person in good faith believes that the certificate of qualification is not valid or that the guardian or conservator does not have the authority to perform the act requested; or

The person believes in good faith that the transaction may involve, facilitate, result in, or contribute to financial exploitation.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.15; 1998, c. 582; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1011; 2012, c. 614; 2016, c. 30; 2020, c. 702.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 30 added “and to the Department of Medical Assistance Services” at the end of subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 702 added subdivisions D 1 and D 2.

§ 64.2-2012.
Petition for restoration, modification, or termination; effects.

Upon petition by the incapacitated person, the guardian or conservator, or any other person or upon motion of the court, the court may (i) declare the incapacitated person restored to capacity; (ii) modify the type of appointment or the areas of protection, management, or assistance previously granted or require a new bond; (iii) terminate the guardianship or conservatorship; (iv) order removal of the guardian or conservator as provided in §

64.2-1410

; or (v) order other appropriate relief. The fee for filing the petition shall be as provided in subdivision A 42 of §

17.1-275

.

In the case of a petition for modification to expand the scope of a guardianship or conservatorship, the incapacitated person shall be entitled to a jury, upon request. Notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition shall be personally served on the incapacitated person and mailed to other persons entitled to notice pursuant to §

64.2-2004

. The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the incapacitated person and may appoint one or more licensed physicians or psychologists or licensed professionals skilled in the assessment and treatment of the physical or mental conditions of the incapacitated person, as alleged in the petition, to conduct an evaluation. Upon the filing of any other such petition or upon the motion of the court, and after reasonable notice to the incapacitated person, any guardian or conservator, any attorney of record, any person entitled to notice of the filing of an original petition as provided in §

64.2-2004

, and any other person or entity as the court may require, the court shall hold a hearing.

An order appointing a guardian or conservator may be revoked, modified, or terminated upon a finding that it is in the best interests of the incapacitated person and that:

The incapacitated person is no longer in need of the assistance or protection of a guardian or conservator;

The extent of protection, management, or assistance previously granted is either excessive or insufficient considering the current need of the incapacitated person;

The incapacitated person’s understanding or capacity to manage his estate and financial affairs or to provide for his health, care, or safety has so changed as to warrant such action; or

Circumstances are such that the guardianship or conservatorship is no longer necessary or is insufficient.

The court shall declare the person restored to capacity and discharge the guardian or conservator if, on the basis of evidence offered at the hearing, the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the incapacitated person has substantially regained his ability to (i) care for his person in the case of a guardianship or (ii) manage and handle his estate in the case of a conservatorship.In the case of a petition for modification of a guardianship or conservatorship, the court shall order (a) limiting or reducing the powers of the guardian or conservator if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that it is in the best interests of the incapacitated person to do so, or (b) increasing or expanding the powers of the guardian or conservator if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that it is in the best interests of the incapacitated person to do so.The court may order a new bond or other appropriate relief upon finding by a preponderance of the evidence that the guardian or conservator is not acting in the best interests of the incapacitated person or of the estate.

The powers of a guardian or conservator shall terminate upon the death, resignation, or removal of the guardian or conservator or upon the termination of the guardianship or conservatorship.A guardianship or conservatorship shall terminate upon the death of the incapacitated person or, if ordered by the court, following a hearing on the petition of any interested person.

The court may allow reasonable compensation from the estate of the incapacitated person to any guardian ad litem, attorney, or evaluator appointed pursuant to this section. Any compensation allowed shall be taxed as costs of the proceeding.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.16; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1012; 2012, c. 614; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “subdivision A 42” for “subdivision A 43” in clause (v) of subsection A.

§ 64.2-2013.
Standby guardianship or conservatorship for incapacitated persons.

For purposes of this section, the term “person” includes a child or a parent sharing a biological relationship with one another or having a relationship established by adoption, a relationship established pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

20-156

et seq.) of Title 20, or a relationship established by a judicial proceeding that establishes parentage or orders legal guardianship. The term includes persons 18 years of age and over.

On petition of one or both parents, one or more children, or the legal guardian of an incapacitated person made to the circuit court for the jurisdiction where the parent, parents, child, children, or legal guardian resides, the court may appoint a standby guardian or a standby conservator, or both, of the incapacitated person. The appointment of the standby fiduciary shall be affirmed biennially by the parent, parents, child, children, or legal guardian of the person and by the standby fiduciary prior to his assuming his position as fiduciary by filing with the court an affidavit that states that the standby fiduciary remains available and capable to fulfill his duties.

The standby fiduciary shall be authorized without further proceedings to assume the duties of his office immediately upon the death or adjudication of incapacity of the last surviving of the parents or children of the incapacitated person or of his legal guardian, subject to confirmation of his appointment by the circuit court within 60 days following assumption of his duties. If the incapacitated person is 18 years of age or older, the court, before confirming the appointment of the standby fiduciary, shall conduct a hearing pursuant to this article. The requirements of the court and the powers, duties, and liabilities that pertain to guardians and conservators govern the confirmation of the standby fiduciary and shall apply to the standby fiduciary upon the assumption of his duties.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.17; 2004, c. 135; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1013; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2014.
Clerk to index findings of incapacity or restoration; notice of findings.

A copy of the court’s findings that a person is incapacitated or has been restored to capacity, or a copy of any order appointing a conservator or guardian pursuant to §

64.2-2115

, shall be filed by the judge with the clerk of the circuit court for the county or city where the hearing took place as soon as practicable, but no later than the close of business on the next business day following the completion of the hearing. The clerk shall properly index the findings in the index to deed books by reference to the order book and page whereon the order is spread and shall immediately notify the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in accordance with §

64.2-2028

, the commissioner of accounts in order to ensure compliance by a conservator with the duties imposed pursuant to §§

64.2-2021

,

64.2-2022

,

64.2-2023

, and

64.2-2026

, and the Commissioner of Elections with the information required by §

24.2-410

. If a guardian is appointed, the clerk shall forward a copy of the court order to the local department of social services of the jurisdiction where the person then resides and to the Department of Medical Assistance Services. If a guardianship is terminated or otherwise modified, the clerk shall forward a copy of the court order to the local department of social services to which the original order of appointment was forwarded, to the local department of social services in the jurisdiction where the person then resides, if different from the department to which the original order was forwarded, and to the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

The clerk shall, as soon as practicable, but no later than the close of business on the following business day, certify and forward upon receipt to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, on a form provided by the Exchange, a copy of any order adjudicating a person incapacitated under this article, any order appointing a conservator or guardian pursuant to §

64.2-2115

, and any order of restoration of capacity under §

64.2-2012

. Except as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

19.2-389

, the copy of the form and the order shall be kept confidential in a separate file and used only to determine a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase, or transfer a firearm.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.18; 1998, c. 582; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1014; 2011, c. 518; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 542; 2014, cc. 336, 374; 2015, c. 540; 2016, c. 30.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 542, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Commissioner of Elections” for “Secretary of the State Board of Elections” in the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 336 and 374 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “for the county or city where the hearing took place as soon as practicable, but no later than the close of business on the next business day following the completion of the hearing” at the end of the first sentence; and in subsection B inserted “as soon as practicable, but no later than the close of business on the following day” and substituted “upon receipt” for “forthwith.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 540 substituted “Except as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

19.2-389

, the” for “The” in the second sentence of subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 30 added “and to the Department of Medical Assistance Services” at the end of the third sentence and substituted “to the local department of social services in the jurisdiction where the person then resides, if different from the department to which the original order was forwarded, and to the Department of Medical Assistance Services” for “and, if different, to the local department of social services in the jurisdiction where the person then resides,” in the last sentence of subsection A.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

State Police may provide mental health information to FBI to determine a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase, or transfer a firearm. —

The Department of State Police has the authority to provide certain mental health information maintained in the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, so long as it is (i) kept confidential; and (ii) used only to determine a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase or transfer a firearm. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W. Gerald Massengill, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 01-062 (4/4/02) (decided under prior law).

§ 64.2-2015.
When no guardian or conservator appointed within one month of adjudication.

If a person is adjudicated incapacitated and in need of a guardian or conservator and the court has not identified any person to serve as guardian or conservator within one month from the adjudication, the court may appoint a local or regional program of the Virginia Public Guardian and Conservator Program authorized by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services pursuant to Article 6 (§

51.5-149

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5. If there is no such local or regional program within the court’s jurisdiction, the court may appoint any local or regional program within 60 miles of the residence of the incapacitated person as identified by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. However, the court shall not appoint any such local or regional program that has reached or exceeded its ideal ratio of clients to staff pursuant to regulations adopted by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services under §

51.5-150

.

If any person appointed as a fiduciary under this title refuses the trust or fails to give bond as required within one month from the date of his appointment, the court, on motion of any interested person, may appoint some other person as fiduciary, taking from the fiduciary the bond required, or shall commit the estate of the respondent to the sheriff of the county or city where the respondent is an inhabitant; and the sheriff shall be the fiduciary, and he and the sureties in his official bond shall be bound for the faithful performance of the trust.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-145; 1950, p. 923; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-137; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1976, c. 671; 1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.19; 1998, c. 787; 2005, cc. 712, 716, § 37.2-1015; 2012, cc. 614, 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, amended former § 37.2-1015, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 4, the 2012 amendments by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59,
have been given effect in this section by substituting “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department for the Aging” three times and substituting “Article 6 (§

51.5-149

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5” for “Article 2 (§ 2.2-711 et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 2.2” and “51.5-150” for “2.2-712” in the first paragraph.

§ 64.2-2016.
Trustees for incapacitated veterans and their beneficiaries.

Whenever any veteran of the armed forces of the United States or the beneficiary of any veteran is found to be incapacitated by the medical authorities of the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, on motion of the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or any interested person, and after reasonable notice to the veteran or beneficiary, the circuit court of the county or the city in which the veteran or beneficiary resides, in lieu of appointing a conservator or finding him to be incapacitated, shall appoint a trustee for the veteran or the beneficiary of the veteran where it appears to the court that a trustee is needed for the purpose of receiving and administering pension, compensation, insurance, or other benefits that might be paid by the United States government. Any motion shall be accompanied by a certificate of the Secretary of Veterans Affairs or his duly authorized representative certifying that the veteran or beneficiary has been rated incapacitated by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs and that the appointment of a trustee is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the veteran or the beneficiary.

Upon his qualification, the trustee, in addition to administering the funds payable through the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, shall administer the entire estate of the veteran or the beneficiary regardless of the source from which it is derived and, in such administration, shall have the same powers and duties and be subject to the same liabilities as are vested in or imposed upon a conservator pursuant to this chapter. The trustee, in addition to the duties and obligations imposed upon him under his trust by the federal government, shall be subject to the state laws that are applicable to the appointment and administration of conservators for incapacitated persons.

The court that appointed the trustee for a veteran or beneficiary pursuant to this section may subsequently find that the veteran or beneficiary has been restored to capacity.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.20; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1016; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2017.
Payments from U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.

Monthly payments of pension, compensation, insurance, or other benefits from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs made to a trustee or other fiduciary shall be considered as income and not principal, but the accumulation of such monthly payments received by a trustee or other fiduciary and in his possession at the end of the accounting year may be carried over as principal and converted into the corpus of the estate when the accumulation amounts to $2,000 or more.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-150.1; 1966, c. 310; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-143; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1017; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532 substituted “$2,000” for “$200.”

§ 64.2-2018.
Taking of bond by clerk of court.

Whenever this title provides for the appointment of a fiduciary by a circuit court, the clerk of the court also shall have the authority to take the required bond, set the penalty thereof, and pass upon the sufficiency of the surety thereon.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-144.1; 1958, c. 277; 1968, cc. 383, 477, § 37.1-136; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1019; 2012, c. 614.